cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/el_rules
// Greek -modern
 
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// all words lower case

// Alphabet
// Α α, Β β, Γ γ, Δ δ, Ε ε, Ζ ζ, Η η, Θ θ, Ι ι, Κ κ, Λ λ, Μ μ, Ν ν, Ξ ξ,
// Ο ο, Π π, Ρ ρ, Σ σ ς (word-final form), Τ τ, Υ υ, Φ φ, Χ χ, Ψ ψ, Ω ω.

// Letter group B:   θ κ ξ π ς σ τ φ χ  (voiceless consonants)
// Letter group Y:   ε η ι υ  έ ή ί ύ  (front vowels).

.L01 αι ε ι η υ οι ει  αί έ ί ή ύ οί εί 


.group α
           α        a
           αι       e
           αί       'e
           αυ       av
           αυ (B    af      // +voiceless consonant κ, π, τ, χ, θ, σ, ξ.
           αύ      'av
           αύ (B   'af      // +voiceless consonant κ, π, τ, χ, θ, σ, ξ.
           αη       aI
           αϊ       aI

.group β
           β        v
           β (β

.group γ
           γ        Q
           γγ       g
           γκ       g
        A) γγ       Ng
        A) γκ       Ng
           γ (χ     N
           γ (L01   j
           γαι (A   j
           γε (A    j
           γι (A    j
           γη (A    j
           γυ (A    j
           γοι (A   j
           γει (A   j

.group δ
           δ        D
           δ (δ


.group ε
           ε        e
           ει       i
           εί       'i
        C) ει (A    ;
           ευ       ev
           ευ (B    ef      // +voiceless consonant
           ευ (β    e
           ευ (φ    e
           εύ      'ev
           εύ (B   'ef      // +voiceless consonant
           εύ (β   'e
           εύ (φ   'e

.group ζ
           ζ        z
           ζ (ζ
           ζη (A    z;
           ζι (A    z;
           ζυ (A    z;
           ζει (A   z;
           ζοι (A   z;

.group η
           η        i
        C) η (A     ;
           ηυ       iv
           ηυ (B    if      // +voiceless consonant

.group θ
           θ        T
           θ (θ

.group ι
           ι        i
        C) ι (A     ;
        ρ) ι (A     i
        δ) ι (α_    i
           ι (ε     i

.group κ
           κ        k
           κ (κ
       ν_) κ        g

           κ (Y     c
           κ (αι    c
           κ (αί    c
           κ (οι    c
           κ (οί    c

           κη (A    c  // k + i sound = [c]
           κι (A    c
           κυ (A    c
           κει (A   c
           κοι (A   c


.group λ
           λ        l
           λ (λ
           λη (A    l^
           λι (A    l^
           λυ (A    l^
           λει (A   l^
           λοι (A   l^

.group μ
           μ        m
           μ (μ
        _) μπ       b

.group ν
           ν        n
           ν (ν
           ντ       d  // always? or not after a vowel?
           ν (_π    m
           ν (_ψ    m
           ν (_κ    N
           ν (_και_  n  // there is a pause before και
           ν (_ξ    N

           νη (A    n^
           νι (A    n^
           νυ (A    n^
           νει (A   n^
           νοι (A   n^


.group ξ
           ξ        ks
           ξ (ξ
       ν_) ξ        gz

.group ο
           ο        o
           οι       i
           οί       'i
        C) οι (A    ;
           ου       u
           ού       'u
           οη       oI
           οϊ       oI

.group π
           π        p
           π (π
       ν_) π        b

.group ρ
           ρ        r
           ρρ       r
        A) ρ (A     r
        C) ρ        r

       αυ) ρ        r   // υ  becomes consionant [v]
       αύ) ρ        r
       ευ) ρ        r
       εύ) ρ        r
       ηυ) ρ        r
       ηύ) ρ        r


.group σ
           σ        s
// ??          σ (σ
           ση (A    s;
           σι (A    s;
           συ (A    s;
           σει (A   s;
           σοι (A   s;

.group ς
           ς        s
           ς (_B    s    // +voiceless consonant
           ς (_C    z

.group τ
           τ        t
           τ (τ
           τσ       ts
           τζ       dz
       ν_) τ        d
       ν_) τσ       dz

.group υ
           υ        i
        C) υ (A     ;
           υι       i
           υί       'i

.group φ
           φ        f
           φ (φ

.group χ
           χ        x
           χ (Y     C
           χ (αι    C
           χ (αί    C
           χ (οι    C
           χ (οί    C

           χει (A   C
           χη (A    C
           χι (A    C
           χοι (A   C
           χυ (A    C

.group ψ
           ψ        ps
           ψ (ψ
       ν_) ψ        bz

.group ω
           ω        o



.group
           ά        'a
           άη       'aI
           άι       'aI
           έ        'e
           ή        'i
           ί        'i
           ΰ        'i
           ϊ        i
           ϋ        i
           ό        'o
           όη       'oI
           όι       'oI
           ύ        'i
           ώ        'o

           .        tel'ia
           , (D     k'oma
           !        Tavmastik'o
        !) !
